Maryland, session 2025, HB0013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
10–715.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CONTRACT OF SALE FOR
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT AN INDIVIDUAL BUYER
EXECUTES WITH THE SERVICES OF A REAL ESTATE BROKER.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PURCHASE BY:
(I) A CORPORATE OR OTHER BUSINESS ENTITY; OR
(II) A FIDUCIARY ACTING FOR THE BENEFIT OF A THIRD PARTY.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO ELIMINATE BIAS,
INTENTIONAL OR OTHERWISE, IN HOUSING DECISIONS CONCERNING THE SALE OF
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY TO AN INDIVIDUAL BUYER BY
REMOVING THE NAME OF THE BUYER FROM THE CONTRACT OF SALE PRIOR TO
ACCEPTANCE OF THE CONTRACT BY THE SELLER.
(C) A RESIDENTIAL CONTRACT OF SALE MAY NOT CONTAIN THE NAME OF AN
INDIVIDUAL BUYER PRIOR TO ACCEPTANCE OF THE CONTRACT BY THE SELLER.
(D) BEFORE OR DURING THE PREPARATION OF A RESIDENTIAL CONTRACT
OF SALE, THE INDIVIDUAL BUYER SHALL EXECUTE WITH THE BUYER’S REAL ESTATE
BROKER:
(1) A BUYER–BROKER AGREEMENT; OR
(2) AN UNREPRESENTED BUYER AGREEMENT THAT:
(I) IDENTIFIES THE BUYER AS AN INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) STATES THAT THE BUYER:
1. HAS NOT MISREPRESENTED THE BUYER’S STATUS AS
AN INDIVIDUAL;

HOUSE BILL 13 3
2. HAS NOT BEEN CONVICTED OF FRAUD FOR A
MISREPRESENTATION MADE IN CONNECTION WITH THE PURCHASE OF RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY; AND
3. INTENDS TO OCCUPY THE RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY AS THE INDIVIDUAL BUYER’S PRINCIPAL PLACE OF RESIDENCE.
(E) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE INTERPRETED TO AFFECT
REQUIREMENTS REGARDING THE IDENTIFICATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL BUYER:
(1) IN A DEED OR OTHER INSTRUMENT OFFERED FOR RECORDATION
IN THE LAND RECORDS UNDER TITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) IN A MORTGAGE APPLICATION, MORTGAGE, OR DEED OF TRUST
SECURED BY RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY;
(3) MARKING THE INDIVIDUAL BUYER’S INITIALS ON THE
RESIDENTIAL CONTRACT OF SALE AS VALID AND BINDING ACCORDING TO THE
STATUTE OF FRAUDS; OR
(4) ON THE RESIDENTIAL CONTRACT OF SALE AT THE TIME OF
CONTRACT ACCEPTANCE BY THE SELLER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any residential contract of sale before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.